ko: 표면 면: 양면; 단면; 기타
nb: Overflatesider: Dobbelsidet; Enkelsidet; Annet
en: Surface sides: Double-sided; Single-sided; Other
it: Lati della superficie: Doppi lavandini; Lavandino singolo; Altro
es: Lados de la superficie: Doble cara; Una cara; Otros
sv: Ytsidor: Dubbelsidig; Enkelsidig; Övrigt
el: Πλευρές επιφάνειας: Διπλής όψης; Μονόπλευρη; Άλλο
fi: Pinnan puolet: Kaksipuolinen; Yksipuolinen; Muu
sk-SK: Strany povrchu: Obojstranný; Jednostranný; Iné
pl: Strony powierzchni roboczej: Dwustronny; Jednostronny; Inne
da: Overfladesider: Dobbeltsidet; Enkeltsidet; Andet
ja: 使用面数: 両面; 片面; その他
pt-PT: Lados da superfície: Dupla face; Uma face; Outro
hu: Felület oldalai: Kétoldalas; Egyoldalas; Egyéb
vi: Mặt bề mặt: Hai mặt; Một mặt; Khác
hr-HR: Strane površine: Dvostrani; Jednostrani; Ostalo
cs: Strany povrchu: Oboustranný; Jednostranný; Jiné
ro-RO: Părți ale suprafeței: Cu două fețe; Cu o singură față; Altele
bg-BG: Страни на повърхността: Двустранен; Едностранен; Други
zh-CN: 表面面数: 双面; 单面; 其他
pt-BR: Lados da superfície: Dupla face; Uma face; Outro
zh-TW: 可用面數: 雙面; 單面; 其他
lt-LT: Paviršiaus pusės: Dvipusis; Vienpusis; Kita
th: ด้านพื้นผิว: สองด้าน; ด้านเดียว; อื่นๆ
ru: Стороны поверхности: Двусторонний; Односторонний; Другой
de: Oberflächenseiten: Doppelseitig; Einseitig; Sonstiges
fr: Côtés de surface: Double face; Une seule face; Autre
tr: Yüzey tarafları: Çift taraflı; Tek taraflı; Diğer
sl-SI: Strani površine: Dvostranski; Enostranski; Drugo
nl: Oppervlaktezijden: Dubbelzijdig; Enkelzijdig; Andere